Louisiana, session 2025s1, HB5.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part I-B of Chapter 5 of Title 18 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 18:419, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART I-B. SPECIAL PROVISIONS FOR CERTAIN ELECTIONS HELD IN 2026
§419. Redistricting website; 2026 election cycle
A. The legislature shall provide for, maintain, and update as necessary a
redistricting website during the 2026 election cycle, which may be the same website
as provided for in R.S. 24:992.
B. At a minimum, the redistricting website shall contain the following
information:
(1) Any document or material presented or distributed by the legislature at
a redistricting public hearing.
(2) Any document or material related to redistricting and presented or
distributed by the legislature at a legislative committee hearing.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 251ES-15 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 5
(3) Any written testimony, materials, or redistricting plans submitted by the
public at a redistricting public hearing or in the manner prescribed by the legislature.
(4) Any legislative instrument containing a redistricting plan and all related
mapping files, including geospacial shape files or ASCII, comma delimited block
equivalency import files which indicate the census block assignments in accordance
with the redistricting plan.
(5) Any analysis conducted by a third party on behalf of the legislature
related to any redistricting plan's compliance with traditional redistricting criteria or
state or federal laws.
C. For purposes of this Section, "redistricting public hearing" means a
hearing conducted pursuant to R.S. 24:991.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.